New York, session 2025-2026, A6025.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The judiciary law is amended by adding a new section 511 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 511. Senior citizens exempt from jury duty. 1. Upon claiming 4 exemption therefrom, a prospective juror who is seventy-five years of 5 age or older, shall be exempt from jury duty. 6 2. The chief administrator of the courts shall prescribe a form to be 7 used therefor. Any qualified person may file such form with the appro- 8 priate commissioner of jurors who shall thereupon exempt such person 9 from jury duty. Such exemption shall remain valid unless such exempted 10 person requests to be reinstated as a prospective juror in a form and 11 manner as promulgated by the chief administrator of the courts. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 14 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 15 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 16 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10044-01-5